Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2451.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 41-1551.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE41-1551.01. Arizona space commission; board of directors; membership; powers and duties; annual strategic plan A. The Arizona space commission is established. The commission is governed by a board of directors consisting of seven members who are appointed by the governor, three members who are appointed by the president of the senate and three members who are appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. B. When making the appointments to the board pursuant to subsection A of this section, priority shall be given to all of the following: 1. Individuals with experience in any of the following: (a) Commercial aerospace. (b) Civil aviation. (c) Military aerospace. (d) Space economic development. (e) Space-related academic research. (f) Nonprofit space economy support. (g) Real estate. (h) Finance. 2. Individuals with a master's degree or above in any of the following disciplines: (a) Space science. (b) Space engineering. (c) Space technology. (d) Space business. (e) Space leadership. (f) Space policy. (g) Space law. (h) Space operations. 3. Individuals from an early stage start-up company that focuses on the development and commercialization of new technologies related to space. 4. Individuals with experience working in industries that are based in this state and that are part of the space value chain or that are in downstream industries with a significant presence in this state. C. The initial members shall assign themselves by lot to terms of two, four and six years in office expiring in 2027, 2029 and 2031.  If the initial appointments made PURSUANT to this SUBSECTION occur after the term end date, the initial members' terms shall expire six years after the term end date. All subsequent members of the board shall serve six-year terms in office. All vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the initial appointment within thirty days after the vacancy. D. The board shall: 1. Elect a chairperson from among the members of the board. 2. Direct the activities of, establish goals for and provide oversight of the commission. 3. Establish standards to ensure the proper use of fund monies. 4. Identify research and funding opportunities within this state that do the following: (a) Strengthen and enhance this state's position in civil, commercial and military aeronautics research and development and space flight infrastructure. (b) Enhance the integration of the space aeronautics, astronautics and aviation industries in this state. (c) Promote and research materials derived from or developed through space exploration and space flight. 5. Promote and assist developing workforce training to advance emerging technologies required for all aspects of space exploration. 6. Solicit proposals for funding and research opportunities related to the objectives of this section. E. The board may: 1. Appoint an ad hoc advisory committee as necessary to carry out the board's duties pursuant to this section. 2. Acquire and convey property or an interest in property in this state. 3. Engage in planning and implementing of astronautics and aerospace-related educational opportunities in this state. F. The authority shall provide staff support to the commission. G. The commission shall develop and annually update a strategic plan for promoting and expanding space, aeronautics and aviation in this state, including a list of potential projects to further the purposes of the commission. The commission shall include both of the following for each potential project: 1. The estimated total cost for the project, including any available matching state monies. 2. An assessment of the availability of external funding sources. H. The board shall conduct a hearing to review and amend or approve the strategic plan. I. On or before December 31, 2024 2026 and each even-numbered year thereafter, the commission shall submit the strategic plan to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Retroactivity Section 41-1551.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, applies retroactively to from and after December 30, 2025. Sec. 3. Emergency This act is an emergency measure that is necessary to preserve the public peace, health or safety and is operative immediately as provided by law.